Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-831
Violations; recovery; disposition.

When the Attorney General, on behalf of a state agency or political subdivision, is authorized to investigate, file suit, or otherwise take action in connection with violations under sections 59-801 to 59-831, any recovery of damages or costs by judgment, court decree, settlement in or out of court, or other final result shall be subject to the following:

(1) Upon recovery of damages or any monetary payment except criminal penalties, the costs, expenses, or billings incurred by any state agency or political subdivision in any investigation or other action arising out of a violation under sections 59-801 to 59-831 shall be sought out in any judgment, court decree, settlement in or out of court, or other final result. Any recovered costs shall be deposited by the Attorney General in the fund from which such costs were expended; and

(2) When the Attorney General makes recovery pursuant to sections 59-801 to 59-831 on behalf of a state agency or political subdivision of any money, funds, securities, or other things of value in the nature of civil damages or other, except criminal penalties, whether such recovery shall be by way of verdict, judgment, compromise, or settlement in or out of court, or other final disposition of any case or controversy, such money, funds, securities, or other things of value shall be deposited by the Attorney General in the fund from which the funds which are being recovered were expended.

Laws 1983, LB 32, § 7;

Laws 2002, LB 1278, § 20.